District of Columbia statutes.
47-862

Rules and regulations for tax deferral provisions.

The Mayor may promulgate rules and regulations for the proper administration of the provisions of §§ 47-845 and 47-846 [repealed].

Oct. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-119, § 5, 25 DCR 1514
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-862.
1973 Ed., § 47-662.
Section 47-846 was repealed by § 3 of D.C. Law 4-128.